Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
CHAPTER 39C State Aid to Local Emergency Management Programs

39C.010.
Supplementary state funds.

In order to develop and maintain effective local emergency management agencies, and comprehensive emergency management programs and related activities, it is declared to be the policy of the Commonwealth of Kentucky to encourage and assist the counties, cities, urban-county governments or charter county governments of the Commonwealth by authorizing, and there is hereby authorized, the expenditure of supplementary state funds for local emergency management agencies which are created, administered, operated, and maintained pursuant to KRS Chapters 39A to 39F, and are integral components of the integrated emergency management system of this Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 40, effective July 15, 1998.

39C.020.
Allocation of state funds.

Supplementary state funds appropriated to the division shall be allocated by the division to local emergency management agencies on a reimbursement basis in amounts not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of the total local funds expended by the local agencies in any given year for the institution, administration, or support of the comprehensive emergency management programs of the city, county, urban-county government or charter county government.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 41, effective July 15, 1998.

39C.030.
Purpose of supplementary state fund.

The purpose of the supplementary state fund established in KRS

39C.010

and

39C.020

is to:

Assist local emergency management agencies established pursuant to KRS Chapters 39A to 39F to develop adequate comprehensive emergency management programs and disaster and emergency response capabilities;

Maintain and improve these agencies, programs, and capabilities through enhanced training, planning, staffing, administration, operations, and equipment acquisition; and

Benefit the Commonwealth as a whole, through creation of an effective and responsive statewide integrated emergency management system.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 42, effective July 15, 1998.

39C.040.
Director’s responsibility — Advisory committee.

The Director of the Division of Emergency Management shall have overall responsibility for policy, guidance, administration, and proper utilization of the supplementary fund established in KRS

39C.010

and

39C.020

.

The director shall serve as the principal liaison between the division and local officials participating in programs affected by this fund.

The director shall appoint an advisory committee consisting of seven (7) members, including no more than four (4) employees of the staff of the division, to assist in making initial funding allocations each fiscal year and in making quarterly adjustments, based upon program and financial reviews. The members of the committee shall serve at the pleasure of the director, but for no more than four (4) years without reappointment, and shall serve without reimbursement, except when funded through the emergency management assistance programs. The decisions of the committees shall be advisory only and not binding upon the director.

The director, with the advice of the advisory committee, shall make determinations related to fund allocations.

Area managers of the division shall fully explain program opportunities and requirements to local elected officials and local directors, review budget and program submissions, and make recommendations to the director.

Funds pursuant to KRS

39C.010

and

39C.020

shall be made available to not more than one (1) local emergency management agency in any county on a reimbursement basis up to fifty percent (50%) of the total local funds expended in any given year by the local emergency management agency created pursuant to KRS Chapters 39A to 39F.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 43, effective July 15, 1998.

39C.050.
Criteria for funding local emergency management agencies.

Local emergency management agencies created pursuant to KRS

39B.010

shall be eligible to apply for benefits from the fund created pursuant to KRS

39C.010

and

39C.020

if they meet the following criteria:

The local emergency management agency shall have a qualified, duly appointed local director who is capable of fully executing the duties of the position pursuant to KRS

39B.030

. Unless the local director has already completed an introductory emergency management course or is determined by the director to be suitably qualified, during the first year of participation in the funding program, the local director, whether serving on a voluntary or paid basis, shall have successfully completed all correspondence courses specified by the division by administrative regulation. The local director shall also participate in an emergency management workshop when offered. Unless the local director has already completed an introductory emergency management course or is determined by the director to be suitably qualified, each local director shall also attend an introductory emergency management course when offered.

In each following year, each local director shall attend an emergency management workshop, when offered.

In subsequent years, a local director shall continue his or her education by annually completing advanced instruction offered by the division, including the training courses and the Emergency Management Development Program as required by administrative regulations promulgated by the division. The requirements of this section may be met by successfully completing related courses offered by federal agencies and other organizations, as approved by the division.

Each local emergency management agency employee, other than the local director, whose salary is reimbursed in part by this fund, shall attend one (1) emergency management workshop at least every other year, and shall complete other instruction offered by the division as required by administrative regulations promulgated by the division.

The local director appointed pursuant to KRS Chapters 39A to 39F, shall develop a local emergency operations plan and appropriate annexes. This plan shall be subject to concurrence review by the director of the division. In subsequent years, the plan and all annexes shall annually be reviewed, updated, approved, and officially adopted in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapters 39A to 39F.

During the second and each subsequent year of participation in the program, the local director shall conduct an exercise to test the local emergency operations plan in accordance with exercise program requirements and guidelines of the Federal Emergency Management Agency or the division.

Each local emergency management agency created pursuant to KRS Chapters 39A to 39F shall provide for an organized and designated emergency operating center in the local jurisdiction from which all operations of the local disaster and emergency services organization shall be coordinated. This center shall provide resources for communications, information management, and other operational capabilities necessary to ensure the coordination of all disaster and emergency response in the local jurisdiction. The local emergency operations center shall be a direction and control component of the integrated emergency management system of the Commonwealth.

Each local emergency management agency shall develop, and submit annually to the division, a program paper detailing agency administrative data, current staff personnel listings, a specific work plan of program objectives scheduled for accomplishment during the next fiscal year, and a budget request. Forms and guidance materials for this report shall be provided by the division.

Each employee of a local emergency management agency created pursuant to this chapter with the exception of the local director and each deputy, if the deputy functions in a policymaking capacity, whose salary is reimbursed in part or in total with these funds, shall meet the standards of the Kentucky merit system, or the standards of the Federal Office of Personnel Management or its successor or local equivalent, when recognized by the director.

In order for a local emergency management agency to participate in the funding program, one (1) of the following persons shall attend an annual emergency management workshop:

The county judge/executive;

The deputy county judge/executive;

The mayor of an urban-county government, or of a consolidated local government, or of the largest city in the county, or the mayor of the city which is the county seat of the county, or the chief executive of other local government;

The city manager;

The local emergency management deputy director; or

A member of the fiscal court, urban-county council, or consolidated local government of the county.

The division shall determine by administrative regulation:

Public officials and disaster and emergency services personnel who may be reimbursed for attendance at emergency management workshops or other activities; and

Reimbursements for attending courses and workshops, which shall be limited as follows:

Reimbursement rates for meals and travel mileage shall not exceed those for state employees.

Reimbursement shall be made for attending the workshop or course nearest to the participant’s residence. A participant may attend a workshop at a greater distance but will be reimbursed for meals and mileage equal to that of attending the nearest workshop or course. In cases of extreme hardship, the nearest course or workshop requirement may be waived, in writing, by the director.

The division shall:

Publicize all available state and federal emergency management agency training courses to mayors, county judges/executive, and local directors; and

Assist local personnel listed in this section in gaining entrance to state and federal emergency management agency training courses.

If, at any time, the director of the division determines that a local emergency management agency or a local director does not comply with the eligibility requirements of this section, the director shall notify that local director and the appointing authorities, in writing, of the intent to deny financial assistance to the local emergency management agency. The local director shall have ten (10) working days to come into compliance or otherwise provide information to the director to justify eligibility for funding. If the director continues to determine that the local emergency management agency or the local director does not meet eligibility requirements, the local emergency management agency shall be ineligible for funds and the director shall notify the local director and the appointing authorities, of the determination. A local director aggrieved by a decision of the director may appeal to the Franklin Circuit Court within twenty (20) days of the receipt of the director’s decision. The court’s review shall be from the record and shall not be de novo.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 44, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 346, § 10, effective July 15, 2002.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Appeal of administrative decision to Franklin Circuit Court, KRS

13B.140

.

39C.060.
Request for financial aid — Review and evaluation criteria.

Local emergency management agencies requesting financial aid from the fund created pursuant to KRS

39C.010

and

39C.020

, shall submit, not later than July 15 of each year, a local “Annual Program Paper” application to the area manager of the division.

The area manager shall review the application and accompanying documents and forward them to the director of the division along with the area manager’s assessments and recommendations, not later than August 15 of each year.

The director shall submit the request for financial aid to the advisory committee for its review and recommendations. The advisory committee shall review the application, accompanying documents, and the assessment and recommendation of the area manager and make a recommendation to the director with regard to the application and the request for funding.

Requests for funding shall be evaluated by the following criteria:

Meeting the eligibility criteria specified in KRS

39C.050

, unless some aspect thereof has been waived as provided in KRS

39C.090

.

Meeting all the requirements specified by the division for developing, preparing, maintaining, and submitting the annual program paper.

Local emergency operations plans submitted and a determination of their conformity to the Kentucky Emergency Operations Plan, and an assessment of their capability, state of currency, sign of official adoption, and general adequacy to provide for the coordination of disaster and emergency response operations.

Past program performance of the local director in fully carrying out the duties of local director as specified in KRS

39B.030

, and overall program performance as it relates to completeness, adequacy, and timeliness in accomplishing program tasks, objectives, or goals.

Historical spending records for this and similar programs.

Local resources committed to the program on a per capita basis.

If available funds do not meet the total funds requested by all local emergency management agencies, then funding allocations may be reduced after a reevaluation of the criteria set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

The director of the Division of Emergency Management shall then review and evaluate each application, together with the recommendations thereon, and not later than September 15 of each year, designate and approve funds for eligible local emergency management agencies and notify the local director.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 45, effective July 15, 1998.

39C.070.
Reimbursement — Claims and equipment purchase.

Within fifteen (15) days of the end of each month, the local emergency management agency shall submit a completed claim of reimbursement with supporting documentation to the area manager of the division. After review, the area manager shall forward the documentation for administrative review and a reimbursement check shall be returned to the jurisdiction. Reimbursement shall be at the predetermined rate.

Requests to utilize these funds to purchase any item of emergency management-related administrative or office equipment having a total cost in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) shall be submitted to the director for approval or denial before the purchase. To obtain approval, the local emergency management agency shall submit a project application to the area manager, who shall review it and forward it to the director, together with the area manager’s recommendations in reference thereto. If the application is approved by the director, the local emergency management agency shall be notified of the approval and, after making the purchase, may submit a reimbursement claim.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 46, effective July 15, 1998.

39C.080.
Performance evaluations — Records and reports — Review of program progress and compliance — Correction of deficiencies — Appeal process.

The performance of each local emergency management agency or local director receiving funding pursuant to KRS

39C.010

and

39C.020

shall be evaluated quarterly as to compliance with the provisions of KRS Chapters 39A to 39F, satisfactory program administration, and the achievement of scheduled program objectives by the local emergency management agency or local director. Based upon this evaluation:

Programs which are judged deficient, or otherwise not in compliance with KRS Chapters 39A to 39F, or program guidance of the division, may have funds withheld and those funds which have been withheld may be transferred to other local emergency management agencies.

Programs which meet or exceed their minimum program objectives and have needs for additional funds for program improvements may be granted additional requested funds, or portions thereof, for use by the local emergency management agency in making the improvements, subject to the availability of funds.

Within fifteen (15) days after the end of each quarter, the local emergency management director shall prepare and submit all documentation, records, or reports required by the division to substantiate and document the work activity of the local director and the local emergency management agency in performing official duties or work plan objectives during each quarter.

Program progress and compliance shall be reviewed quarterly by the area manager of the geographical area in which the local emergency management agency is located. The area manager shall review training records, exercise reports, financial records and budget expenditure rates, all work plan documentation reports or materials submitted by the local director at the end of each quarter, program guidance materials, or other sources of information, and make an assessment as to whether the local emergency management agency or local director is in compliance with current program requirements or guidance, or is making satisfactory progress toward the full achievement of the objectives outlined in the work plan of the annual program paper. The area manager shall transmit an assessment report to the director of the division together with any recommendations thereon.

The director shall then review the material submitted, together with the area manager’s recommendations, and submit it to the advisory committee for its evaluation and recommendations with regard thereto.

The advisory committee shall transmit to the director its determination of the local emergency management agency’s state of compliance or progress, and that of the local director, and the committee’s recommendations with regard thereto. The director shall review the report and all recommendations thereon. The director shall then make a final determination with regard to compliance and progress and, if a deficiency is found, the measures which shall be taken to assure compliance.

Local emergency management agencies or local directors determined not to be making satisfactory progress toward the accomplishment or completion of work plan objectives as outlined in the annual program paper, or not performing in accordance with the written program guidance or the requirements of KRS Chapters 39A to 39F, shall be given thirty (30) days to correct the deficiencies in the manner outlined by the director.

A local emergency management agency aggrieved by a decision of the director may appeal to the Franklin Circuit Court within twenty (20) days of the receipt of the director’s decision. The court’s review shall be from the record and shall not be de novo, unless the record is insufficient.

If a decision has been made by the director to withhold funding from the local emergency management agency, that funding shall remain withheld during the pendency of any appeals of the decision.

At the end of the thirty (30) day period further funding may be withdrawn by the director, if the deficiencies have not been corrected. The funds may then be reallocated to other local emergency management agencies.

The director, during the review process outlined in this section, shall also review the expenditure rate of each local emergency management agency receiving funds. If it is determined that a local agency will not utilize all allocated funds, appropriate portions of the allocation may be withdrawn and reallocated to another local emergency management agency.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 47, effective July 15, 1998.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Appeal of administrative decision to Franklin Circuit Court, KRS

13B.140

.

39C.090.
Requests for waiver of requirements.

Requests for the waiver of any requirement of KRS

39C.050

,

39C.060

,

39C.070

, and

39C.080

or any criteria of KRS Chapter 39F may be submitted with appropriate justification to the director of the division. The director may grant waivers only upon the finding that the justification merits special action and failure to grant the waiver would jeopardize the continuation or development of a viable local emergency management agency and program. In every case, the director shall insure that the local agency and program continues to meet the basic intent of KRS Chapter 39B. Waivers shall apply on a one (1) time basis relating to a specific request and shall not be construed to establish precedents.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 48, effective July 15, 1998.

39C.100.
Administration of supplementary state funding program — Administrative regulations.

The division shall administer the supplementary state funding program authorized in KRS

39C.010

and

39C.020

and the division shall, by administrative regulations, promulgate and apply eligibility requirements and standards of performance to be achieved by all local emergency management agencies. The division may promulgate other administrative regulations, and issue any program guidance, necessary to carry out the provisions of KRS

39C.010

and

39C.020

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 49, effective July 15, 1998.

39C.110.
Workers’ compensation coverage — Limitations.

Local emergency management agencies, including local directors or their deputies, and other local emergency management agency staff personnel and workers, and local emergency management agency-supervised operating units or personnel officially affiliated with the local disaster and emergency services organizations pursuant to KRS

39B.070

, paid or volunteer, for the purposes of receiving workers’ compensation benefits paid by the division, shall be covered by those benefits when performing emergency assessment, mitigation, preparedness, response, or recovery functions, with the following limitations:

The local emergency management agencies, including local directors or staff personnel and workers, and local emergency management agency-supervised operating units or personnel, shall not be covered when performing fundraising functions, unless all proceeds of the function are to be dedicated to the administration or operation of the local emergency management agency or operating unit.

No person shall be covered when performing hazardous materials emergency response operations defined in 29 C.F.R. 1910.120 which are above the first-responder operations level, on-scene incident commander level excluded, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

A volunteer hazardous materials response team as defined in 29 C.F.R. 1910.120 which meets all provisions of 29 C.F.R. 1910.120(q), operates on a regional basis, and is supervised by a local emergency management agency may, by action of the director pursuant to administrative regulations, be provided Kentucky emergency management workers’ compensation coverage. Such hazardous materials response teams shall take no actions involving environmental clean-up, removal, or transportation of hazardous substances or materials except as may be essential for initial emergency control or initial emergency stabilization when there is a clear and evident risk of harm to people.

No person shall be covered unless enrolled on a workers’ compensation enrollment form that is filed with the area manager of the division, except when the magnitude of an emergency, or a preparedness exercise activity, is so great that a local director must solicit additional workers. At these times, the local director may develop and maintain a list of workers, to include names, Social Security account numbers, missions assigned, and dates covered, and submit a copy of the list to the area manager within twenty-four (24) hours of the conclusion of the emergency, or the preparedness exercise activity.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 50, effective July 15, 1998.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Workers’ Compensation, KRS Ch. 342.

39C.990.
Penalty.

Any person violating any provision of this chapter or any administrative regulation promulgated or order issued pursuant to this chapter for which another penalty is not specified shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 51, effective July 15, 1998.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/98). Although the introductory clause for 1998 Ky. Acts ch. 226, sec. 51 indicated that this statute was to be placed in KRS Chapter 39D, it is clear from context that KRS chapter 39C was intended because KRS Chapter 39D had its own penalty provision at 1998 Ky. Acts ch. 226, sec. 57. Therefore, to correct this manifest clerical or typographical error, KRS 7.136(1)(h), this statute has been codified in KRS Chapter 39C.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Sentence of imprisonment for misdemeanor, KRS

532.090

.